Florida, session 2026, HB291.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (2) of section 320.60, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
320.60 Definitions for ss. 320.61-320.70.—Whenever used in
ss. 320.61-320.70, unless the context otherwise requires, the
following words and terms have the following meanings:
(2)(a) "Common entity" means a person:
1. Who is directly or indirectly controlled by or has more
than 30 percent of its equity interest directly or indirectly
owned, beneficially or of record, through any form of ownership
structure, by a manufacturer, an importer, a distributor, or a
licensee, or an affiliate thereof; or
2. Who has more than 30 percent of its equity interest
directly or indirectly controlled or owned, beneficially or of
record, through any form of ownership structure, by one or more
persons who also directly or indirectly control or own,
beneficially or of record, more than 30 percent of the equity
interests of a manufacturer, an importer, a distributor, or a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb291-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 291 2026
licensee, or an affiliate thereof.
(b) Notwithstanding subparagraph (a)1. or subparagraph
(a)2., an entity that would otherwise be considered a common
entity of a distributor or a manufacturer under subparagraph
(a)1. or subparagraph (a)2. because of its relation to a
distributor or a manufacturer is not considered a common entity
of that distributor or manufacturer if:
1.a. The distributor to which the entity is related was a
licensed distributor on March 1, 2023;
b.2. The entity is not a common entity of a manufacturer
or an importer; and
c.3. The distributor to which the entity is related is
not, and has never been, a common entity of a manufacturer or an
importer; or
2. The entity was incorporated in the United States and
solely manufactures or assembles vehicles that are part of a
motor vehicle line-make that has no franchised motor vehicle
dealers in this state.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb291-00